Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
DOMESTIC STOCK INSURERS

§431:4-201 Other laws applicable.
Domestic stock insurers shall be subject to title 23 and any applicable general
laws enacted pertaining to stock corporations except where inconsistent with
the express provisions of this article. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1993, c
205, §9]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next